Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3601
Act, how cited.

Sections 2-3601 to 2-3635 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Corn Resources Act.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1336, § 1.